Tennessee, session 114, SB0714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1602(a)(4), is amended by
deleting "October 31" and substituting "October 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0714
002398
- 1 -